Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.32.030

May borrow from home loan bank.

Any such bank, insurance company, or association, may borrow from any home loan bank and as security for borrowing may pledge therewith the notes, mortgages, trust deeds which it holds as shall be required by federal law, and under such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by a federal home loan bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 202; 1955 c 33 s 30.32.030. Prior: 1933 c 105 s 2; RRS s 3294-2. Formerly RCW 30.32.030.]